Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.
§ 51-9-123.
Construction contracts.

All construction contracts by the district, where the amount of the contract shall exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), shall be made upon at least three weeks’ public notice by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, which notice shall state the thing to be done and invite sealed proposals, to be filed with the secretary of the district, to do the work; and in all such cases, before the notice shall be published, the plans and specification for the work shall be filed with the secretary of the district and there remain. The board of directors of the district shall award the contract to the lowest bidder, who will comply with the terms imposed by such board and enter into bond with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, in such penalty as shall be fixed by such board, but in no case to be less than the contract price, conditioned for the prompt, proper, and efficient performance of the contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-62; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-125.
Park and recreation facilities.

The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District is authorized to establish or otherwise provide for public parks and recreation facilities and for the preservation of fish and wildlife and to acquire land otherwise than by condemnation except as provided in subsection (f) of Section 51-9-121, for such purposes, within the project area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-63; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-127.
Rules and regulations.

The board of directors of the district shall have the power to adopt and promulgate all reasonable regulations to secure, maintain, and preserve the sanitary condition of all water in and to flow into any reservoir owned by the district, to prevent waste of water or the unauthorized use thereof, and to regulate residence, hunting, fishing, boating, camping, circulation of vehicular traffic on land, the parking of such vehicles, and all recreational and business privileges in, along, or around any such reservoir, any body of land, or any easement owned by the district.

All such regulations prescribed by the board of directors, after publication in a daily newspaper of statewide circulation and in a newspaper of general circulation in each county comprising the area of the district, shall have the full force and effect of law; and violation thereof shall be punishable by fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), as may be prescribed in such regulations, or by imprisonment not to exceed fifteen (15) days, or both the amount of the fine and the term of the imprisonment, within the maximum limit set by this statute and within the maximum limit prescribed in such regulations, to be determined by the court.

All such rules and regulations so prescribed and the penalties fixed thereunder relating to hunting, fishing, and boating shall not conflict with, exceed, alter, or suspend any regulations, rules, or penalties prescribed by general statute or by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks; and all fines and penalties levied and collected under this article shall be remitted and accounted for in accordance with the general statutes relating thereto.

In the event of a violation of any regulation adopted to prevent pollution of the waters in any reservoir owned by the district, or the threat of continuous violation thereof, the district shall have authority to sue for and obtain damages and other appropriate relief, including injunctive relief.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-64; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 14; Laws, 1964, ch. 250, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 91, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 51-9-129.
Appropriation permit.

The district is empowered to obtain through appropriate hearings an appropriation permit or permits from the board of water commissioners of the State of Mississippi, as provided for in Section 51-3-31.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-65; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-131.
State tax used for water supply district fund.

In each county of the State of Mississippi which is part of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, beginning with the ad valorem tax assessment for the calendar year 1960, payable on or before February 1, 1961, and so long as any bonds issued hereunder are outstanding, the tax collector of said county shall pay into the depository selected by said water district for said purpose the amount of two mills of all ad valorem taxes due by said county to the State of Mississippi which is collected by the tax collector of said county, which may be collected by any other lawful taxing agency of said county and state and for said county, and the State of Mississippi shall continue to levy not less than two mills ad valorem taxes on each county in the district so long as any bonds issued pursuant to this article remain outstanding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-66; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-133.
Board of directors to issue bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized and empowered to issue bonds of the district for the purpose of paying the costs of acquiring, owning, constructing, operating, repairing, and maintaining the projects and works specified herein, including related facilities, and including all financing and financial advisory charges, interest during construction, engineering, legal, and other expenses incidental to and necessary for the foregoing, or for the carrying out of any power conferred by this article. Said board of directors is authorized and empowered to issue such bonds at such times and in such amounts as shall be provided for by resolution of the said board of directors, not to exceed the limitation prescribed in Section 51-9-137. All such bonds so issued by said district shall be secured solely by a pledge of the net revenues which may now or hereafter come to the district, by the pledge of the avails of the two mill ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-9-131, and by the pledge of the special tax levy of two mills provided for in Section 51-9-139; and such bonds shall not constitute general obligations of the State of Mississippi or of the counties comprising said district, and shall not be secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit, and resources of said state or of said counties. Bonds of the district shall not be included in computing any present or future debt limit of any county in such district under any present or future law. “Revenues” as used in this article shall mean all charges, rentals, tolls, rates, gifts, grants, tax proceeds, moneys, and all other funds coming into the possession of the district by virtue of the provisions of this article, except the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued hereunder. “Net revenues” as used in this article shall mean the revenues after payment of costs and expenses of operation and maintenance of the project and related facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-67; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-135.
Details of bonds; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

All bonds provided for by Sections 51-9-133 and 51-9-145 of this article shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code, shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting, shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), shall be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, it shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto. Such bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, as may be determined by the sale of such bonds. They shall mature annually in such amounts and at such times as shall be provided by the resolution of the board of directors. However, no bond issued under Section 51-9-133 shall have a longer maturity than forty (40) years from January 1, 1961, and the first maturity date thereof shall be not more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. The denomination, form and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution of the board of directors of the district. Such bonds shall be signed by the president and secretary of such board with the seal of the district affixed thereto, but the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president and secretary. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

Such bonds may provide that they may be called in, paid and redeemed in inverse numerical order on any interest date prior to maturity, upon not less than thirty (30) days’ notice to the paying agent or agents designated in such bonds, and at such premium as may be designated in such bonds. In no case shall any premiums exceed six percent (6%) of the face value of such bonds.

All such bonds shall contain in substance a statement to the effect that they are secured solely by a pledge of the net revenues of such district, including the avails of the two-mill ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-9-131, and the avails of the special tax levy of two (2) mills provided for in Section 51-9-139, and that they do not constitute general obligations of the state of Mississippi or of the counties comprising said district, and are not secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit and resources of said state or of such counties.

All such bonds as provided for herein shall be sold at public sale as now provided by law. No such sale shall be at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent (6%) per annum computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity.

This article shall be full and complete authority for the issuance of the bonds provided for herein, and no restriction or limitation otherwise prescribed by law shall apply herein.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-68; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 18; Laws, 1964, ch. 250, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 51-9-137.
Limitation on amount of bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to this article shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) in principal amount.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-69; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-139.
Special tax levy for payment of bonds.

To provide additional funds for the payment of the principal of, interest on, and other charges in connection with bonds issued under the provisions of this article, in the event its anticipated revenue and funds are found to be insufficient therefor by order entered on its minutes each year that such tax is found necessary, a copy of which order shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in each county of the district thirty days before such levy is made by the board of supervisors, the district is also empowered to levy annually a special tax, not to exceed two mills upon all of the taxable property within such district, on or before the first Monday of September of each year and shall certify the levy to the boards of supervisors of the various counties in said district; and it shall be the duty of the boards of supervisors to make said levy on each tract of land or other property in said county, according to the assessed valuation thereof. Such taxes shall be collected by the tax collectors of the respective counties in said district, who shall deposit them in such depository as shall be selected by the board of directors of the district. Where bonds are issued payable wholly or partially from ad valorem taxes, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to levy a tax sufficient, together with pledged revenues other than the taxes authorized hereunder, to pay the bonds and the interest thereon as such bonds and interest become due, provided that in no event shall the tax levied exceed two mills. Any part of this levy lost through homestead exemption shall not be reimbursed by the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-70; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-140.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1973, ch. 414, eff from and after June 30, 1974.

[En., Laws, 1968, ch. 263; Laws, 1970, ch. 294; Laws, 1971, ch. 433; Laws, 1972, ch. 402; Laws, 1973, ch. 414]

§ 51-9-141.
Validation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be validated as now provided by law by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972. The services of the state’s bond attorney may be employed in the preparation of such bond resolutions, forms, or proceedings as may be necessary, for which he shall be paid a reasonable fee. Such validation proceedings shall be instituted in the chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, but notice of such validation proceedings shall be published at least two times in a newspaper of general circulation and published in each of the counties comprising the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, the first publication of which in each case shall be made at least ten days preceding the date set for the validation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-71; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-143.
Trust agreement.

At the discretion of the board of directors of the district any bonds provided for in Section 51-9-133 may be further secured by a trust agreement between the board of directors and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. The trust agreement may contain provision for the issuance of additional bonds for any of the purposes authorized by this article, which shall be secured by the revenues pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein. The trust agreement may include provisions to the effect that if there is any default in the payment of principal or interest on any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the properties and facilities of the district described in the trust agreement, on behalf of the district, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities, or commodities of the district or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing said receiver; and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding, or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of said bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the issuance of such bonds and said trust agreement. The fee for the services of any corporate trustee shall not exceed the normal charges for acting as paying agent plus any additional amount or amounts allowed by the court as the reasonable value of services rendered by the corporate trustee upon default in the payment of principal and interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-72; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-145.
Refunding bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the district for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding and issued under authority of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturity and other details thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the board of directors and of the district in respect to such bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this article, insofar as they are applicable. In no event shall such bonds mature over a period of time exceeding forty years from January 1, 1961. No such refunding bonds shall be issued and delivered more than five years in advance of the date when the bonds to be refunded are redeemable, and not until such outstanding bonds shall have been called for redemption and notice thereof provided for as therein required. The proceeds of any such refunding bonds shall be deposited with the trustee named in the bonds to be refunded and, pending the application thereof to the payment and redemption of the bonds to be refunded, shall be invested and reinvested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States of America and maturing or being redeemable at or prior to the time when the said bond proceeds are required for the redemption of the bonds to be refunded. All interest or other increment received on or on account of all such investments shall be deposited in and become a part of the fund held by the trustee for the payment and redemption of such refunding bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-73; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 23; Laws, 1964, ch. 250, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 51-9-147.
Bonds to be legal investments.

All bonds of the district shall be and are hereby declared to be legal and authorized investments for public funds of counties, cities, towns, school districts, banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and for funds of the Mississippi Public Employee’s Retirement System. Such bonds shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of cities, towns, villages, counties, school districts, or other political corporations or subdivisions of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient security for said deposits to the extent of their value, when accompanied by all unmatured coupons appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-74; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-149.
Depository for funds of district.

The board of directors shall designate one or more qualified state depositories within the district to serve as depositories for the funds of the district, and all funds of the district other than funds required by any trust agreement to be deposited, from time to time, with the trustee or any paying agent for outstanding bonds of the district shall be deposited in such depository or depositories. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds.

Before designating a depository or depositories, the board of directors shall issue a notice stating the time and place the board will meet for such purpose and inviting the qualified state depositories in the district to submit applications to be designated depositories. The term of service for depositories shall be prescribed by the board. Such notice shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper or newspapers published in the district and specified by the board.

At the time mentioned in the notice, the board shall consider the applications and the management and condition of the depositories filing them, and shall designate as depositories the qualified state depository or depositories which offer the most favorable terms and conditions for the handling of the funds of the district and which the board finds have proper management and are in condition to warrant handling of district funds. Membership on the board of directors of an officer or director of a depository shall not disqualify such depository from being designated as a depository.

If no applications acceptable to the board are received by the time stated in the notice, the board shall designate some qualified state depository or depositories within or without the district upon such terms and conditions as it may find advantageous to the district. Any such designated depository shall be eligible to hold funds of the district to the extent that it is qualified as a depository for state funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-75; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 25; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 11, eff from and after December 1, 1988.

§ 51-9-151.
Agreements relative to federal highways.

The board of directors of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District is hereby authorized and empowered to negotiate and contract with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, concerning all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary for the relocation of any federal road, highway, parkway, or for the facilities appurtenant thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-76; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-153.
Cooperation with other governmental agencies.

The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District shall have authority to act jointly with political subdivisions of the state and agencies, commissions, and instrumentalities thereof, with other states, with municipalities, and with the federal government and other agencies thereof, in the performance of the purposes and services authorized in this article, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the directors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-77; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-155.
Water supply district law controlling.

The provisions of any other law, general, special or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article. The water supply district herein provided for shall not be subject to regulation or control by the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-78; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-157.
District and its bonds exempt from taxation.

The accomplishment of the purposes stated in this article being for the benefit of the people of this state and for the improvement of their properties and industries, the district in carrying out the purposes of this article will be performing an essential public function and shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on the project and related facilities or any part thereof, and the interest on the bonds issued hereunder shall at all times be free from taxation within this state. The state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds to be issued hereunder that the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its political subdivisions or taxing districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-79; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-159.
Preliminary expenses.

Any municipality or county which is within the territorial limits of the district may advance funds to said district to pay the preliminary expenses, including engineers’ reports, organization, or administration expenses, on such terms of repayment as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, such municipality or county is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed one year from the date of such borrowing, for the purpose of making such advances. The board of directors is hereby authorized to repay any such advances from the proceeds of any bonds issued under the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-80; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-161.
Overflow of school lands not to constitute waste.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that the overflow and inundation of sixteenth section lands or in lieu lands shall not constitute legal waste of such lands. The district shall pay a reasonable rental for the use of such lands to be overflowed, to be determined as provided by law in such cases. Any sixteenth section lands that have been flooded shall be reforested before this project shall ever be abandoned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-81; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).

§ 51-9-163.
Savings clause.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to violate any provision of the federal or state constitutions, and all acts done under this article shall be done in such manner as will conform thereto, whether herein expressly provided or not. Where any procedure hereunder may be held by any court to be violative of either of such constitutions, the district shall have the power by resolution to provide an alternative procedure conformable with such constitutions. If any provision of this article shall be invalid, such fact shall not affect the creation of the district or the validity of any other provision of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-82; Laws, 1958, ch. 197, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1958).